North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 67. Swine Farms.

§ 106-800.
Title.

This Article shall be known as the “Swine Farm Siting Act”.

History.

1995, c. 420, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, s. 7(a); 1997-458, s. 4.1.

Cross References.

As to moratorium on construction or expansion of swine farms, see notes under

G.S. 143-215.10

A.

§ 106-801.
Purpose.

The General Assembly finds that certain limitations on the siting of swine houses and lagoons for swine farms can assist in the development of pork production, which contributes to the economic development of the State, by lessening the interference with the use and enjoyment of adjoining property.

History.

1995, c. 420, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, s. 7(a); 1997-458, s. 4.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Eight Million Little Pigs — A Cautionary Tale: Statutory and Regulatory Responses to Concentrated Hog Farming,” see 31 Wake Forest L. Rev. 851 (1996).

§ 106-802.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Lagoon” means a confined body of water to hold animal byproducts including bodily waste from animals or a mixture of waste with feed, bedding, litter or other agricultural materials.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 626, s. 7, effective June 21, 1996.

“Occupied residence” means a dwelling actually inhabited by a person on a continuous basis as exemplified by a person living in his or her home.

(3a)

“Outdoor recreational facility” means any plot or tract of land on which there is located an outdoor swimming pool, tennis court, or golf course that is open to either the general public or to the members and guests of any organization having 50 or more members.

“Site evaluation” means an investigation to determine if a site meets all federal and State standards as evidenced by the Waste Management Facility Site Evaluation Report on file with the Soil and Water Conservation District office or a comparable report certified by a professional engineer or a comparable report certified by a technical specialist approved by the North Carolina Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

“Swine farm” means a tract of land devoted to raising 250 or more animals of the porcine species.

“Swine house” means a building that shelters porcine animals on a continuous basis.

History.

1995, c. 420, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, s. 7(a); c. 743, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1997-456, s. 15; 1997-458, s. 4.1; 1997-496, s. 12.

§ 106-803.
Siting requirements for swine houses, lagoons, and land areas onto which waste is applied at swine farms.

A swine house or a lagoon that is a component of a swine farm shall be located:

At least 1,500 feet from any occupied residence.

At least 2,500 feet from any school; hospital; church; outdoor recreational facility; national park; State Park, as defined in G.S. 143B-135.44; historic property acquired by the State pursuant to

G.S. 121-9

or listed in the North Carolina Register of Historic Places pursuant to

G.S. 121-4.1

; or child care center, as defined in

G.S. 110-86

, that is licensed under Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes.

At least 500 feet from any property boundary.

At least 500 feet from any well supplying water to a public water system, as defined in

G.S. 130A-313

.

At least 500 feet from any other well that supplies water for human consumption. This subdivision does not apply to a well located on the same parcel or tract of land on which the swine house or lagoon is located and that supplies water only for use on that parcel or tract of land or for use on adjacent parcels or tracts of land all of which are under common ownership or control.

(a1)

The outer perimeter of the land area onto which waste is applied from a lagoon that is a component of a swine farm shall be at least 75 feet from any boundary of property on which an occupied residence is located and from any perennial stream or river, other than an irrigation ditch or canal.

(a2)

No component of a liquid animal waste management system for which a permit is required under Part 1 or 1A of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, other than a land application site, shall be constructed on land that is located within the 100-year floodplain.

A swine house or a lagoon that is a component of a swine farm may be located closer to a residence, school, hospital, church, or a property boundary than is allowed under subsection (a) of this section if written permission is given by the owner of the property and recorded with the Register of Deeds.

History.

1995, c. 420, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, s. 7(a); 1997-458, s. 4.1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(mm).

§ 106-804.
Enforcement.

Any person who owns property directly affected by the siting requirements of

G.S. 106-803

pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may bring a civil action against the owner or operator of a swine farm who has violated

G.S. 106-803

and may seek any one or more of the following:

Injunctive relief.

An order enforcing the siting requirements under G.S. 106-803.

Damages caused by the violation.

A person is directly affected by the siting requirements of

G.S. 106-803

only if the person owns a facility or property located within the siting requirements specified under

G.S. 106-803

.

If the court determines it is appropriate, the court may award court costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and expert witnesses’ fees, to any party. If a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is sought, the court may require the filing of a bond or equivalent security. The court shall determine the amount of the bond or security.

Nothing in this section shall restrict any other right that any person may have under any statute or common law to seek injunctive or other relief.

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, s. 7(a); 1997-458, s. 4.1.

§ 106-805.
Written notice of swine farms.

Any person who intends to construct a swine farm whose animal waste management system is subject to a permit under Part 1 or 1A of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes shall, after completing a site evaluation and before the farm site is modified, notify all adjoining property owners; all property owners who own property located across a public road, street, or highway from the swine farm; the county or counties in which the farm site is located; and the local health department or departments having jurisdiction over the farm site of that person’s intent to construct the swine farm. This notice shall be by certified mail sent to the address on record at the property tax office in the county in which the land is located. Notice to a county shall be sent to the county manager or, if there is no county manager, to the chair of the board of county commissioners. Notice to a local health department shall be sent to the local health director. The written notice shall include all of the following:

The name and address of the person intending to construct a swine farm.

The type of swine farm and the design capacity of the animal waste management system.

The name and address of the technical specialist preparing the waste management plan.

The address of the local Soil and Water Conservation District office.

Information informing the adjoining property owners and the property owners who own property located across a public road, street, or highway from the swine farm that they may submit written comments to the Division of Water Resources, Department of Environmental Quality.

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, s. 7(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 27.34(d); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1997-458, s. 4.1; 2013-413, s. 57(d); 2014-115, s 17; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 106-806.
Construction or renovation of swine houses at preexisting swine farms.

As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

“Farm digester system” means a farm digester system as defined in G.S. 143-213(12a).

“New swine farm” means any swine farm the operations of which were sited on or after October 1, 1995. “New swine farm” does not include any preexisting swine farm, even if a subsequent site evaluation is performed on or after October 1, 1995, at the preexisting swine farm.

“Preexisting swine farm” means any swine farm either the operations of which were begun prior to October 1, 1995, or the site evaluation of which was approved prior to October 1, 1995, by the Department of Environmental Quality under Part 1A of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

“Renovation or construction,” “renovated or constructed,” and any similar phrase mean any activity to renovate, construct, reconstruct, rebuild, modify, alter, change, restructure, upgrade, improve, enlarge, reduce, move, or otherwise perform construction work on a swine house that is a component of a swine farm.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Article, a swine house that is a component of a preexisting swine farm can be constructed or renovated if the construction or renovation of that swine house satisfies all of the following requirements:

The construction or renovation of the swine house does not result in an increase in the permitted capacity of the swine farm, as measured in the annual steady state live weight capacity of the swine farm.

The construction or renovation of the swine house does not result in requiring an increase in the total permitted capacity of the animal waste management systems located at the swine farm.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, for any swine house that fails to meet any siting requirement for a swine house under

G.S. 106-803

, the construction or renovation of the swine house does not result in any portion of the constructed or renovated swine house being located any closer to the building or the property that is the object of the siting requirement that the swine house fails to meet.

Regardless of the footprint of the existing swine house, renovation or construction of a swine house shall not be allowed in the 100-year floodplain.

A swine house that is a component of a preexisting swine farm can be constructed or renovated such that it results in a portion of the constructed or renovated swine house being located closer to a residence, school, hospital, church, or a property boundary than is allowed under subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section if written permission is given by the owner or owners of the property directly affected by the siting requirements specified under

G.S. 106-803

and recorded with the register of deeds.

This section does not apply to the construction or renovation of a swine house that is a component of a new swine farm.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, a farm digester system that is a component of a preexisting swine farm may be constructed or renovated if the construction or renovation of the farm digester system satisfies all of the following requirements:

The construction or renovation of the farm digester system does not result in an increase in the permitted capacity of the swine farm, as measured by the annual steady state live weight capacity of the swine farm.

The construction or renovation of the farm digester system does not result in requiring an increase in the total permitted capacity of the animal waste management system or systems located at the swine farm.

The construction or renovation of the farm digester system shall comply with the siting requirements set out in

G.S. 106-803

to the maximum extent practicable. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, construction or renovation of the farm digester system shall not result in any portion of the constructed or renovated farm digester system being located closer to the building, property, or well that is the object of the siting requirement than any existing component of the animal waste management system that fails to meet the siting requirements of

G.S. 106-803

.

Renovation or construction of a farm digester system shall not be allowed in the 100-year floodplain.

History.

2011-118, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2021-78, s. 11(g).

§§ 106-807 through 106-809.

Reserved for future codification purposes.